Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1046
Attachment; copy of order; taxation as costs.

The officer, for making out said copy of the same, shall receive such compensation as is now allowed by law for similar services, to be taxed in the costs, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 4, p. 714;

R.S.1913, § 7775;

C.S.1922, § 8719;

C.S.1929, § 20-1046;

R.S.1943, § 25-1046.